Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. FINANCES

SUBTITLE A. MUNICIPAL FINANCES

CHAPTER 106. MUNICIPAL CHILD SAFETY TRUST FUND

Sec. 106.001. CREATION OF CHILD SAFETY TRUST FUND IN CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. A child safety trust fund shall be created in the treasury of a municipality with a population of more than 1.3 million.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 128, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 106.002. DEPOSITS TO FUND. The following money shall be deposited in the fund:

(1) court costs collected under Article 102.014, Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(2) optional motor vehicle registration fees remitted to the municipality by the county under Section 502.403, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.214, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 12.001, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 106.003. USE OF FUND. (a) Money in the fund shall be used for the purpose of providing school crossing guard services as provided by Chapter 343.

(b) After payment of the expenses of the school crossing guard services, any remaining money in the fund may be used for programs designed to enhance child safety, health, or nutrition, including child abuse intervention and prevention and drug and alcohol abuse prevention.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 106.004. AUDIT. (a) Money collected under this chapter is subject to audit by the comptroller.

(b) Money expended under this chapter is subject to audit in the same manner as other funds expended by a county or municipality.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.